Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-101.
Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority created; public purpose.

The General Assembly has determined that there exists in the Commonwealth a need to control the possession, sale, transportation, distribution, and delivery of alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth. Further, the General Assembly determines that the creation of an authority for this purpose is in the public interest, serves a public purpose, and will promote the health, safety, welfare, convenience, and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth. To achieve this objective, there is hereby created an independent political subdivision of the Commonwealth, exclusive of the legislative, executive, or judicial branches of state government, to be known as the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority. The Authority’s exercise of powers and duties conferred by this subtitle shall be deemed the performance of an essential governmental function and a matter of public necessity for which public moneys may be spent. The Board of Directors of the Authority is vested with control of the possession, sale, transportation, distribution, and delivery of alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth, with plenary power to prescribe and enforce regulations and conditions under which alcoholic beverages are possessed, sold, transported, distributed, and delivered, so as to prevent any corrupt, incompetent, dishonest, or unprincipled practices and to promote the health, safety, welfare, convenience, and prosperity of the people of the Commonwealth. The exercise of the powers granted by this subtitle shall be in all respects for the benefit of the citizens of the Commonwealth and for the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, and convenience. No part of the assets or net earnings of the Authority shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributable to, any private individual, except that reasonable compensation may be paid for services rendered to or for the Authority affecting one or more of its purposes, and benefits may be conferred that are in conformity with said purposes, and no private individual shall be entitled to share in the distribution of any of the corporate assets on dissolution of the Authority.

The Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall consist of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, and the agents and employees of the Authority. The Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

Nothing contained in this subtitle shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that the Board of Directors of the Authority might otherwise have under any other law of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-6; 1976, c. 64; 1993, c. 866; 2015, c. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or its successor in interest shall continue to receive IT infrastructure and security services pursuant to Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia until such time as the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or its successor in interest elects to no longer receive such services. However, any such departure from services provided under Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia shall not be made prior to October 1, 2018. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or its successor in interest may determine to continue to receive all or partial services pursuant to Chapter 20.1 (§ 2.2-2005 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia based on mutual agreement between it and the Virginia Information Technologies Agency.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 7 provides: “That the regulations of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board promulgated pursuant to Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia shall be administered by the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority and shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 8 provides: “That in the event that ex officio membership on any board, commission, council, committee, or other body is affected by the provisions of this act, the Governor shall designate an appropriate successor officer, employee, or member of a board or agency established pursuant to the provisions of this act as a replacement.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 9 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 10 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to the extent this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to real or tangible personal property vested in the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act [January 15, 2018] shall be transferred and taken as standing in the name of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 11 provides: “That wherever in the Code of Virginia the term ‘Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control’ is used, it shall be deemed to mean the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority and wherever in the Code of Virginia the term ‘Alcoholic Beverage Control Board’ is used, it shall mean the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 12, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2,
provides: “That any accumulated sick leave, personal leave, or annual leave of any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control who transfers to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall transfer with the employee. Notwithstanding subsection D of §

4.1-101.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, any accrued sick leave of any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control participating in the Traditional Sick Leave Program who transfers to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall be paid out to the employee in accordance with applicable policies and procedures adopted by the Department of Human Resource Management. Notwithstanding subsections B and D of §

51.1-1103

of the Code of Virginia, all employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control participating in the Traditional Sick Leave Program who transfer to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall, upon such transfer, (i) participate in the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program and (ii) be eligible for nonwork related disability benefits without meeting the one-year waiting period required under subsection D of §

51.1-1103

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 14 provides: “That by October 15 each year, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control or its successor shall, for the purposes of identifying the total costs of the operation and administration of the Department or its successors to be funded from the revenues generated by such entity, submit to the General Assembly a report detailing the total percentage of gross revenues required for the operation and administration of the Department, excluding expenditures made for the purchase of distilled spirits, for the prior fiscal year, and a relative comparison to the three prior fiscal years.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 15 provides: “That by January 1, 2017, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall submit to the General Assembly for its review the proposed personnel and procurement policies, including such policies to facilitate the participation of small businesses and businesses owned by women, minorities, and service disabled veterans in the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority’s procurement process, that are developed for the use of the Authority in place of Department policies currently governing personnel and procurement. The submission shall detail all instances in which the proposed policies and procedures materially differ from those governing state agencies.”

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 4 provides: “That, beginning January 15, 2018, special agents and employees of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board (the Board) shall be considered employees and special agents of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (the Department) for the purpose of maintaining continued employment. The Department, including such special agents and employees, shall continue in existence through December 31, 2018. The Board shall continue in existence until July 1, 2018. During the period of January 1, 2018, through December 31, 2018, (i) the Department and the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall exist simultaneously for the purpose of transferring special agents and employees and transitioning operations of the Department to the Authority in accordance with §

4.1-101.05

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the Board of Directors of the Authority shall carry out the duties and responsibilities of the Board, notwithstanding elimination of the Board on July 1, 2018, for the purpose of transferring special agents and employees and facilitating the transition of operations from the Board and Department to the Authority.”

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 5 provides: “That prior to July 1, 2018, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (the Department) shall enter into an operating agreement whereby employees and special agents of the Department are authorized to exercise the powers and duties conferred by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board that are incidental to their employment or agency with the Department and conferred upon the Board of Directors of the Authority in accordance with §

4.1-103

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 6 provides: “That any agent or employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control vested with any powers or duties assigned or delegated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall be authorized to continuously exercise the same powers and duties conferred upon him as if designated the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and rewrote the section, which read “The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control is created and shall consist of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the agents and employees of the Board.”

§ 4.1-101.01.
Board of Directors; membership; terms; compensation.

The Authority shall be governed by a Board of Directors, which shall consist of five citizens at large appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the affirmative vote of a majority of those voting in each house of the General Assembly. Each appointee shall (i) have been a resident of the Commonwealth for a period of at least three years next preceding his appointment, and his continued residency shall be a condition of his tenure in office; (ii) hold, at a minimum, a baccalaureate degree in business or a related field of study; and (iii) possess a minimum of seven years of demonstrated experience or expertise in the direct management, supervision, or control of a business or legal affairs. Appointees shall be subject to a background check in accordance with §

4.1-101.03

.

After the initial staggering of terms, members shall be appointed for a term of five years. All members shall serve until their successors are appointed. Any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. No member appointed by the Governor shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive terms; however, a member appointed to fill a vacancy may serve two additional consecutive terms. Members of the Board may be removed from office by the Governor for cause, including the improper use of its police powers, malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, misconduct, neglect of duty, absenteeism, conflict of interests, failure to carry out the policies of the Commonwealth as established in the Constitution or by the General Assembly, or refusal to carry out a lawful directive of the Governor.

The Governor shall appoint the chairman and vice-chairman of the Board from among the membership of the Board. The Board may elect other subordinate officers, who need not be members of the Board. The Board may also form committees and advisory councils, which may include representatives who are not members of the Board, to undertake more extensive study and discussion of the issues before the Board. A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the Authority’s business, and no vacancy in the membership shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise the rights and perform all duties of the Authority.

The Board shall meet at least every 60 days for the transaction of its business. Special meetings may be held at any time upon the call of the chairman of the Board or the Chief Executive Officer or upon the written request of a majority of the Board members.

Members of the Board shall receive annually such salary, compensation, and reimbursement of expenses for the performance of their official duties as set forth in the general appropriation act for members of the House of Delegates when the General Assembly is not in session, except that the chairman of the Board shall receive annually such salary, compensation, and reimbursement of expenses for the performance of his official duties as set forth in the general appropriation act for a member of the Senate of Virginia when the General Assembly is not in session.

The provisions of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.) shall apply to the members of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer of the Authority, and the employees of the Authority.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of §

4.1-101.01

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall expire on July 1, 2018.” The section as set out above does not include amendments by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707.

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 8 provides: “That a current member of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is eligible for reappointment in accordance with the provisions of this act, provided that such member meets the qualifications set forth in §

4.1-101.01

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, expire July 1, 2018, and inserted subsection A and redesignated subsequent subsections accordingly; and substituted “Beginning July 1, 2018, the” for “The” at the beginning of subsection B.

§ 4.1-101.02.
Appointment, salary, and powers of Chief Executive Officer; appointment of confidential assistant to the Chief Executive Officer.

The Chief Executive Officer of the Authority shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the affirmative vote of a majority of those voting in each house of the General Assembly. The Chief Executive Officer shall not be a member of the Board; shall hold, at a minimum, a baccalaureate degree in business or a related field of study; and shall possess a minimum of seven years of demonstrated experience or expertise in the direct management, supervision, or control of a business or legal affairs. The Chief Executive Officer shall receive such compensation as determined by the Board and approved by the Governor, including any performance bonuses or incentives as the Board deems advisable. The Chief Executive Officer shall be subject to a background check in accordance with §

4.1-101.03

. The Chief Executive Officer shall (i) carry out the powers and duties conferred upon him by the Board or imposed upon him by law and (ii) meet performance measures or targets set by the Board and approved by the Governor. The Chief Executive Officer may be removed from office by the Governor for cause, including the improper use of the Authority’s police powers, malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, misconduct, neglect of duty, absenteeism, conflict of interests, failure to meet performance measures or targets as set by the Board and approved by the Governor, failure to carry out the policies of the Commonwealth as established in the Constitution or by the General Assembly, or refusal to carry out a lawful directive of the Governor.

The Chief Executive Officer shall devote his full time to the performance of his official duties and shall not be engaged in any other profession or occupation.

The Chief Executive Officer shall supervise and administer the operations of the Authority in accordance with this subtitle.

The Chief Executive Officer shall:

Serve as the secretary to the Board and keep a true and full record of all proceedings of the Authority and preserve at the Authority’s general office all books, documents, and papers of the Authority;

Exercise and perform such powers and duties as may be delegated to him by the Board or as may be conferred or imposed upon him by law;

Employ or retain such special agents or employees subordinate to the Chief Executive Officer as may be necessary to fulfill the duties of the Authority conferred upon the Chief Executive Officer, subject to the Board’s approval; and

Make recommendations to the Board for legislative and regulatory changes.

Neither the Chief Executive Officer nor the spouse or any member of the immediate family of the Chief Executive Officer shall make any contribution to a candidate for office or officeholder at the local or state level or cause such a contribution to be made on his behalf.

To assist the Chief Executive Officer in the performance of his duties, the Governor shall also appoint one confidential assistant for administration who shall be deemed to serve on an employment-at-will basis.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item § 4-6.01 C 10, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “10. Notwithstanding any provision of this act, the Board of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may supplement the salary of its Chief Executive Officer in accordance with §

4.1-101.02

. The Board should be guided by criteria, which provide a reasonable limit on the total additional income of the Chief Executive Officer. The criteria should include, without limitation, a consideration of the salaries paid to similar officials in comparable independent agencies. The Board shall report such criteria and potential supplement level to the Chairs of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance and Appropriations Committees at least 60 days prior to the effectuation of the compensation action. The Board shall report approved supplements to the Department of Human Resource Management for retention in its record.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and in subdivision D 3, substituted “Employ” for “Appoint a chief financial officer and employ” and inserted “special” preceding “agents or employees.”

§ 4.1-101.03.
Background investigations of Board members and Chief Executive Officer.

All members of the Board and the Chief Executive Officer shall be fingerprinted before, and as a condition of, appointment. These fingerprints shall be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records search and to the Department of State Police for a Virginia criminal history records search. The Department of State Police shall be reimbursed by the Authority for the cost of investigations conducted pursuant to this section. No person shall be appointed to the Board or appointed by the Board who (i) has defrauded or attempted to defraud any federal, state, or local government or governmental agency or authority by making or filing any report, document, or tax return required by statute or regulation that is fraudulent or contains a false representation of a material fact; (ii) has willfully deceived or attempted to deceive any federal, state, or local government or governmental agency or governmental authority by making or maintaining business records required by statute or regulation that are false and fraudulent; or (iii) has been convicted of (a) a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude or (b) a violation of any law applicable to the manufacture, transportation, possession, use, or sale of alcoholic beverages within the five years immediately preceding appointment.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 4.1-101.04.
Financial interests of Board, employees, and family members prohibited.

No Board member or employee of the Authority shall (i) be a principal stockholder or (ii) otherwise have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensee subject to the provisions of this subtitle or in any entity that has submitted an application for a license under Chapter 2 (§

4.1-200

et seq.). No Board member and no spouse or immediate family member of a Board member shall make any contribution to a candidate for office or officeholder at the local or state level or cause such a contribution to be made on his behalf.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 4.1-101.05.
Employees of the Authority.

Employees of the Authority shall be considered employees of the Commonwealth. Employees of the Authority shall be eligible for membership in the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1 and participation in all health and related insurance and other benefits, including premium conversion and flexible benefits, available to state employees as provided by law. Employees of the Authority shall be employed on such terms and conditions as established by the Board. The Board shall develop and adopt policies and procedures that afford its employees grievance rights, ensure that employment decisions shall be based upon the merit and fitness of applicants, and prohibit discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board shall develop, implement, and administer a paid leave program, which may include annual, personal, and sick leave or any combination thereof. All other leave benefits shall be administered in accordance with Chapter 11 (§

51.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 51.1, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Authority shall give preference in hiring to special agents and employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. The Authority shall issue a written notice to all persons whose employment at the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control will be transferred to the Authority. The date upon which such written notice is issued shall be referred to herein as the “Option Date.” In order to facilitate an orderly and efficient transition and ensure the continuation of operations during the transition from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (the Department) to the Authority, the Authority shall have discretion, subject to the time limitations contained herein, to determine the date upon which any employee’s employment with the Department will end or be transferred to the Authority. This date shall be stated in the written notice and shall be referred to herein as the “Transition Date.” No Transition Date shall occur prior to July 1, 2018, without the mutual agreement of the employee and the Authority. No Transition Date shall be set beyond December 31, 2018. Each person whose employment will be transferred to the Authority may, by written request made within 180 days of the Option Date, elect not to become employed by the Authority. Any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control who (i) is not offered the opportunity to transfer to employment by the Authority or (ii) is not offered a position with the Authority for which the employee is qualified or is offered a position that requires relocation or a reduction in salary shall be eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.). Any employee who accepts employment with the Authority shall not be considered to be involuntarily separated from state employment and shall not be eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act. Any eligibility for such severance benefits shall be contingent on the continued employment through an employee’s Transition Date.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person whose employment is transferred to the Authority as a result of this section and who is a member of any plan for providing health insurance coverage pursuant to Chapter 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall continue to be a member of such health insurance plan under the same terms and conditions as if no transfer had occurred.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person whose employment is transferred to the Authority as a result of this section and who is a member of the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1 shall continue to be a member of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan under the same terms and conditions as if no transfer had occurred.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person whose employment is transferred to the Authority as a result of this section and who was subjected to a criminal history background check as a condition of employment with the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall not be subject to the requirements of §

4.1-103.1

, unless the Authority deems otherwise.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707, 742; 2020, c. 1137.

Cross references.

As to health insurance coverage for state employees, see §

2.2-2818

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 12, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That any accumulated sick leave, personal leave, or annual leave of any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control who transfers to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall transfer with the employee. Notwithstanding subsection D of §

4.1-101.05

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, any accrued sick leave of any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control participating in the Traditional Sick Leave Program who transfers to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall be paid out to the employee in accordance with applicable policies and procedures adopted by the Department of Human Resource Management. Notwithstanding subsections B and D of §

51.1-1103

of the Code of Virginia, all employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control participating in the Traditional Sick Leave Program who transfer to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority in accordance with the provisions of this act shall, upon such transfer, (i) participate in the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program and (ii) be eligible for nonwork related disability benefits without meeting the one-year waiting period required under subsection D of §

51.1-1103

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 4 provides: “That, beginning January 15, 2018, special agents and employees of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board (the Board) shall be considered employees and special agents of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (the Department) for the purpose of maintaining continued employment. The Department, including such special agents and employees, shall continue in existence through December 31, 2018. The Board shall continue in existence until July 1, 2018. During the period of January 1, 2018, through December 31, 2018, (i) the Department and the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall exist simultaneously for the purpose of transferring special agents and employees and transitioning operations of the Department to the Authority in accordance with §

4.1-101.05

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the Board of Directors of the Authority shall carry out the duties and responsibilities of the Board, notwithstanding elimination of the Board on July 1, 2018, for the purpose of transferring special agents and employees and facilitating the transition of operations from the Board and Department to the Authority.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707, in subsection A, inserted “or other retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1”, and added the last two sentences; in subsection B, inserted “special agents and,” deleted “former” preceding “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” throughout, added the fourth through eighth and last sentences; and added subsection E. In addition, c. 707, in subsection B, deleted former clause (ii), which read: “elects not to become employed by the Authority and who is not reemployed by any department, institution, board, commission, or agency of the Commonwealth”; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 742, deleted the former clause (ii) in subsection B, which read: “elects not to become employed by the Authority and who is not reemployed by any department, institution, board, commission, or agency of the Commonwealth” and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the fourth sentence of subsection A.

§ 4.1-101.06.
Moneys of Authority.

All moneys of the Authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid in accordance with §

4.1-116

.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 4.1-101.07.
Forms of accounts and records; audit; annual report.

The accounts and records of the Authority showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in a form prescribed by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his legally authorized representatives shall annually examine the accounts and books of the Authority. The Authority shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before December 15 of each year. Such report shall contain the audited annual financial statements of the Authority for the year ending the previous June 30. The Authority shall also submit a six-year plan detailing its assumed revenue forecast, assumed operating costs, number of retail facilities, capital costs, including lease payments, major acquisitions of services and tangible or intangible property, any material changes to the policies and procedures issued by the Authority related to procurement or personnel, and any proposed marketing activities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in exercising any power conferred under this subtitle, the Authority may implement and maintain independent payroll and nonpayroll disbursement systems. These systems and related procedures shall be subject to review and approval by the State Comptroller. Upon agreement with the State Comptroller, the Authority may report summary level detail on both payroll and nonpayroll transactions to the State Comptroller through the Department of Accounts’ financial management system or its successor system. Such reports shall be made in accordance with policies, procedures, and directives as prescribed by the State Comptroller. A nonpayroll disbursement system shall include all disbursements and expenditures, other than payroll. Such disbursements and expenditures shall include travel reimbursements, revenue refunds, disbursements for vendor payments, petty cash, and interagency payments.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730; 2017, cc. 698, 707.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 698 and 707 are identical, and designated the existing paragraph as subsection A; in subsection A, substituted “December 15” for “November 1”; and added subsection B.

§ 4.1-101.08.
Leases of property.

The Authority shall be exempt from the provisions of §

2.2-1149

and from any rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Division of Engineering and Buildings in relation to leases of real property into which it enters.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Cross references.

As to Division of Engineering and Building, generally, see §

2.2-1129

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 4.1-101.09.
Exemptions from taxes or assessments.

The exercise of the powers granted by this subtitle shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the improvement of their living conditions, and as the undertaking of activities in the furtherance of the purposes of the Authority constitutes the performance of essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this subtitle or upon the income therefrom, including sales and use taxes on the tangible personal property used in the operations of the Authority. The exemption granted in this section shall not be construed to extend to persons conducting on the premises of any property of the Authority businesses for which local or state taxes would otherwise be required.

History.

2015, cc. 38, 730.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2105, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”